Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1308
Certification; qualifications; exception; term.

A person shall be eligible for certification as an environmental health specialist if he or she has graduated with a baccalaureate or higher degree from an accredited college or university, has satisfactorily completed at least forty-five quarter hours or thirty semester hours of academic work in the basic natural sciences, has been employed full time as an environmental health specialist for a period not less than two years, and has passed an examination approved by the board, except that a person holding a degree higher than a baccalaureate degree who has satisfactorily completed at least forty-five quarter hours or thirty semester hours of academic work in the basic natural sciences may qualify when employed as an environmental health specialist for a period of not less than one year.

Laws 1963, c. 400, § 3, p. 1279;

Laws 1989, LB 344, § 28;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 39;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 182;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 117;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3703;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 529.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.